Maine, session 132, LD1606.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 34-B MRSA §5003-B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. LLLLL, §1, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
§5003-B. Services across lifespan
1. Lifespan waiver development. The department shall facilitate the development of
a home and community‑based waiver from the United States Department of Health and
Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that provides services for
individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, autism spectrum disorder or
other related conditions across the lifespan, including smooth transitions from childhood
to adulthood. Upon federal approval, the department shall adopt rules to implement this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
2. Data collection. For each year the lifespan waiver is operational, the department
shall collect data related to service provisions and unmet needs for care for individuals
receiving services or individuals approved for receipt of services under the lifespan waiver
under subsection 1. The data to be collected must include, but is not limited to, the
following:
A. The number of individuals who are unable to access services identified in their
personal plans required by sections 5003-A and 5470-B, sorted by category of service;
B. The number of individuals who do not receive all of the hours or units of service
identified in their personal plans required by sections 5003-A and 5470-B, sorted by
category of service;
C. The number of individuals who are receiving services while living with a service
provider, also known as a shared living provider, in a family-style environment and a
categorization of the providers as family or nonfamily, as well as the ages of the
providers; and
D. The number of individuals who experience residential transitions within each year,
including, but not limited to, transitions between group homes, shared living providers
or self-directed services, sorted by the type of residential arrangements that individuals
are transitioning to and from.
Page 1 - 132LR0884(01)

3. Report. The department shall publish an annual report with the data collected
pursuant to subsection 2. The report must be published on the department's publicly
accessible website and submitted to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over health and human services matters no later than February 28th of each
year.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.